Illinois, session 104th, SB3065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 12-30 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/12-30)7    Sec. 12-30. Mailed notice of changed assessments; counties 8of less than 3,000,000. 9    (a) In every county with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 10in addition to the publication of the list of assessments in 11each year of a general assessment and of the list of property 12for which assessments have been added or changed, as provided 13above, a notice shall be mailed by the chief county assessment 14officer to each taxpayer whose assessment has been changed 15since the last preceding assessment, using the address as it 16appears on the assessor's records, except in the case of 17changes caused by a change in the county equalization factor 18by the Department or in the case of changes resulting from 19equalization by the chief county assessment officer under 20Section 9-210, during any year such change is made. The chief 21county assessment officer shall continue to accept appeals 22from the taxpayer for a period of not less than 30 business 23days from the later of the date the assessment notice is mailed   SB3065- 2 -LRB104 19187 HLH 32632 b1as provided in this subsection or is published on the 2assessor's website. The notice may, but need not be, sent by a 3township assessor.4    (b) The notice sent under this Section shall include the 5following:6        (1) The previous year's assessed value after board of 7    review equalization.8        (2) Current assessed value and the date of that 9    valuation.10        (3) The percentage change from the previous assessed 11    value to the current assessed value.12        (4) The full fair market value (as indicated by 13    dividing the current assessed value by the median level of 14    assessment in the assessment district as determined by the 15    most recent 3 year assessment to sales ratio study 16    adjusted to take into account any changes in assessment 17    levels since the data for the studies were collected).18        (5) A statement advising the taxpayer that assessments 19    of property, other than farm land and coal, are required 20    by law to be assessed at 33 1/3% of fair market value.21        (6) The name, address, phone number, office hours, 22    and, if one exists, the website address of the assessor.23        (7) Where practicable, the notice shall include the 24    reason for any increase in the property's valuation.25        (8) The name and price per copy by mail of the 26    newspaper in which the list of assessments will be   SB3065- 3 -LRB104 19187 HLH 32632 b1    published and the scheduled publication date.2        (9) A statement advising the taxpayer of the steps to 3    follow if the taxpayer believes the full fair market value 4    of the property is incorrect or believes the assessment is 5    not uniform with other comparable properties in the same 6    neighborhood. The statement shall also (i) advise all 7    taxpayers to contact the township assessor's office, in 8    those counties under township organization, first to 9    review the assessment, (ii) advise all taxpayers to file 10    an appeal with the board of review if not satisfied with 11    the assessor review, and (iii) give the phone number to 12    call for a copy of the board of review rules.13        (10) A statement advising the taxpayer that there is a 14    deadline date for filing an appeal with the board of 15    review and indicating that deadline date (30 business days 16    following the scheduled publication date).17        (11) A brief explanation of the relationship between 18    the assessment and the tax bill (including an explanation 19    of the equalization factors) and an explanation that the 20    assessment stated for the preceding year is the assessment 21    after equalization by the board of review in the preceding 22    year.23        (12) In bold type, a notice of possible eligibility 24    for the various homestead exemptions as provided in 25    Section 15-165 through Section 15-175 and Section 15-180.26    (c) In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of   SB3065- 4 -LRB104 19187 HLH 32632 b1this Section, in every county with less than 3,000,000 2inhabitants, where the chief county assessment officer 3maintains and controls an electronic database containing the 4physical characteristics of the property, the notice shall 5include the following:6        (1) The physical characteristics of the taxpayer's 7    property that are available from that database; or8        (2) A statement advising the taxpayer that detailed 9    property characteristics are available on the county 10    website and the URL address of that website.11    (d) In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of 12this Section, in every county with less than 3,000,000 13inhabitants, where the chief county assessment officer does 14not maintain and control an electronic database containing the 15physical characteristics of the property, and where one or 16more townships in the county maintain and control an 17electronic database containing the physical characteristics of 18the property and some or all of the database is available on a 19website that is maintained and controlled by the township, the 20notice shall include a statement advising the taxpayer that 21detailed property characteristics are available on the 22township website and the URL address of that website.23    (e) Except as provided in this Section, the form and 24manner of providing the information and explanations required 25to be in the notice shall be prescribed by the Department. 26(Source: P.A. 96-122, eff. 1-1-10.)   SB3065- 5 -LRB104 19187 HLH 32632 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.